Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.702

Homeless youth—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Child," "juvenile," "youth," and "minor" means any unemancipated individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years.

(2) "Homeless" means without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as set forth in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, P.L. 100–77, July 22, 1987, 101 Stat. 482, and runaway and homeless youth act, P.L. 93–415, Title III, September 7, 1974, 88 Stat. 1129.

(3) "Runaway" means an unmarried and unemancipated minor who is absent from the home of a parent or guardian or other lawful placement without the consent of the parent, guardian, or lawful custodian.

(4) "Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his or her legally authorized residence.

(5) "Unaccompanied" means a youth or young adult experiencing homelessness while not in the physical custody of a parent or guardian.

(6) "Young adult" means a person between eighteen and twenty-four years of age.

[ 2015 c 69 s 3.]